Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,218
Reckless driving or willful reckless driving; third and subsequent offenses; penalty.

Upon a third or subsequent conviction of any person for either reckless driving or willful reckless driving, the person shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. The court shall, as part of the judgment of conviction, order such person not to drive any motor vehicle for any purpose for a period of one year from the date ordered by the court and shall order that the operator's license of such person be revoked for a like period. The revocation shall be administered upon sentencing, upon final judgment of any appeal or review, or upon the date that any probation is revoked.

Laws 1935, c. 134, § 3, p. 485;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-11,100;

Laws 1943, c. 99, § 1, p. 339;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,107;

Laws 1947, c. 148, § 3(6), p. 411;

Laws 1953, c. 214, § 5, p. 758;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 21, p. 1258;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-7,107.05;

Laws 1991, LB 420, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-669.06;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 314;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 16;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 14;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 59.

Applicability of statute to private property, see section 60-6,108.

Defendant found guilty of third offense willful reckless driving, avoiding arrest, and habitual criminal charge received two concurrent ten-year sentences. State v. Goodloe, 197 Neb. 632, 250 N.W.2d 606 (1977).